California statutes. Public Contract Code
 place of such hearing to be given by publication in the newspaper designated in the resolution of intention by at least two insertions therein not more than eight days apart. When, before the day of hearing specified in said notice, 20 days, including Sundays and holidays, have elapsed since the first publication of said notice the board of supervisors shall have acquired power to proceed with such hearing. Said notice shall state the fact of the filing of said report and shall contain (a) a general description of the location and extent of the work or improvement sufficient to identify the same; (b) a description of the district benefited by said work or improvement as contained in said report; (c) either a statement that said report contains an assessment proposed to be levied on each separate parcel of land within said district to retire the bonds proposed to be issued and to pay the interest thereon for each year during which said assessment shall continue, or a description of the zones, if any, into
 which such district is to be divided, and a statement of the percentage to be raised from the land in each of such zones each year for the payment of the installments of principal and interest on the bonds proposed to be issued; (d) a statement of the reasonable value of the work or improvement together with the incidental expenses of the original proceedings and the amount of interest, if any, upon said total; (e) the amount of the payments of principal or interest made upon the bonds previously issued, if any, and the credit or offset to be deducted in the issuance of such new bonds; (f) the total amount of the proposed new bond issue and a description of the bonds proposed to be issued, which bonds shall be as nearly as possible the same as to maturity, rate of interest, and other particulars as the bonds described in the original proceedings for said work or improvement, correcting any errors or irregularities, that may have existed in the bonds in said original proceedings.

(f) Said notice shall advise all persons interested that at the time fixed for the hearing of the report or at the time to which the hearing may be continued any person may appear and be heard upon any of the matters set forth in the report. The board of supervisors shall have power to confirm said report and to revise, correct, or modify the same in respect to any of the matters therein contained either as to the amount or character of the work or improvement done or the reasonable value thereof, the extent of the district to be benefited thereby, the amount of assessment levied upon any particular parcel of land within such district, the zones, if any, into which said district is divided, the percentages to be raised in each or any of said zones, the amount of deductions or offsets by reason of payments of principal or interest upon previously issued bonds, the amount of the bonds proposed to be issued, the maturity or rate of the interest
 thereon, or as to any other matter set forth in said report.

(g) At the conclusion of the hearing the board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution declaring its findings and determinations in the matter, which shall be final and conclusive upon all persons in all proceedings as to all matters so found and determined. If no changes are made in the matters set forth in said report it shall be sufficient in said resolution to declare that said report is confirmed and that bonds shall be issued as therein provided, but if any changes are made such changes shall be set forth and it may be declared that said report is confirmed as so modified by the changes set forth. The clerk of the board of supervisors shall transmit an attested copy of said resolution to the treasurer and upon receipt of the same the treasurer shall immediately proceed to issue the bonds as therein ordered, which said bonds shall be dated as of the date of the adoption of said
 resolution. Said bonds shall be issued and signed in all respects by the same officers and in the same manner and form as if issued pursuant to the provisions of Section 16 of Chapter 354 of the Statutes of 1919. Said bonds by their issuance shall be conclusive evidence of the regularity of all proceedings prior thereto under this act and after the same are issued no assessment or tax levied or collected for the purpose of paying the principal or interest on said bonds shall be held illegal or set aside or refunded by reason of any error, informality, irregularity, omission, or defect in any of the proceedings prior to the issuance of said bonds, nor shall any action or proceedings be thereafter commenced or maintained to cancel or set aside said bonds or prevent the payment thereof or the levy, collection or enforcement of any assessment or taxes for such payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 69. Orange County Flood Control District [21020. - 21024.]

21020.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Orange County Flood Control District, as provided for in Chapter 723 of the Statutes of 1927.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21020.2.

All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, except as provided in this article, estimated to cost in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder in the manner provided in this article. The board of supervisors of the district shall advertise by five or more insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation, or by two or more insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation, printed and published in the district, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or work of the proposed improvement or work and may let by contract separately, any part of the work or improvement. The board shall have the right to reject any bids not suitable to the best interests of the district. In the event all proposals are rejected, or no proposals are received pursuant to advertising, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board of supervisors may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The district shall have power to purchase in the open market, without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work being done by it either under contract or by force account whenever the estimated costs of the materials or supplies do not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000); and provided further, that in case of emergency work, the district shall have the power to purchase in the open market, without advertising for bids therefor, materials and supplies for use in any work, even though the cost thereof should exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

21020.5.

Any improvement for which bonds are voted under the provisions of the act shall be made in conformity with the report, plans, specifications, and map theretofore adopted, as above specified, unless the doing of any of the work described in the report shall be prohibited by law, or be rendered contrary to the best interests of the district by some change of conditions in relation thereto, in which event the board of supervisors may, by a vote of four-fifths of all the members thereof, order necessary changes made in the proposed work or improvements, and may cause new plans and specifications to be made and adopted therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21020.8.

Any work or improvements provided for in the act may be located, constructed, and maintained in, along, or across any public road or highway in the County of Orange, in the manner as to afford security for life and property, but the board of supervisors of the district shall restore or cause to be restored any public road or highway to its former state as near as may be, so as not to impair its usefulness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 555.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

21020.9.

The plans and specifications for any work proposed to be done, or improvements to be made, under the act, in any municipality in the district shall first be approved by the legislative body of the municipality before the commencement of the work or improvements, and before any contract shall be let therefor; provided, that in the event the legislative body shall refuse or neglect to approve the plans and specifications for the work or improvement within 30 days after being requested by the board of supervisors so to do, then the board of supervisors shall omit the doing of the work or making of the improvements within the municipality, and the omission shall not affect the validity of its proceedings under the act, and the funds which were to be expended for the proposed work or improvement in the municipality may be expended elsewhere by the board of supervisors for carrying out the purposes of the act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21021.

Every contract entered into by the district for construction or improvements shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 303 of the Statutes of 1919, as amended; and the board of supervisors of the district shall require the contractor to file with it good and sufficient bonds conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of all claims for labor and material in connection therewith in accordance with the provisions of that act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21022.

The contract shall be entered into by the engineer, and the assessment and warrant, when confirmed, shall be recorded in the office of the engineer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21023.

The governing body of said district shall have full authority to cause to be inserted in specifications and contracts for any flood control work financed or paid for in whole or in part out of moneys obtained from the United States, or any department or agency thereof, as a loan, grant or appropriation, such provisions or terms as may be prescribed by the United States, or such department or agency, as a condition upon which such federal funds are loaned, granted, or appropriated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21024.

Emergency work, found by the board of supervisors to be necessary, may be done by negotiated contract without advertising for bids. If notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 70. American River Flood Control District [21030. - 21031.]

21030.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the American River Flood Control District, as provided for in Chapter 808 of the Statutes of 1927.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21031.

(a) In all work of improvement or repair of any of the works or property of the district and in the furnishing of materials or supplies therefor, when the expenditures required exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), the work shall be done by contract, and shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, after notice by publication in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district for at least two insertions in a weekly newspaper or at least 10 insertions in a daily newspaper; the notices shall state the work contemplated or the materials or supplies required, or both. The board of trustees may reject any bid presented and readvertise in their discretion. The board may declare and determine that in its opinion the work in question can be performed more economically by day labor or the materials or supplies can be furnished at a lower price in the open market, and they may proceed to have the work done or the materials purchased without further observance of the foregoing provisions of this section.

(b) In case of an emergency, the board of trustees may declare a state of great public emergency and proceed to have all necessary work done and materials and supplies furnished without further observance of the foregoing provisions of this section. If notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) None of the foregoing provisions of this section apply to work done by contract with the United States, the State of California, or any political subdivision, or public agency thereof. Any work of improvement or repair provided for in this article may be located, constructed and maintained in, along, or across any railroad, public road, or highway in the County of Sacramento, in a manner that ensures security for life and property. The board of trustees shall restore or cause to be restored the road or highway to its former state as near as possible to preserve its usefulness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 142, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 71. Orange County Water District [21040. - 21045.]

21040.

This article shall apply to contracts by the Orange County Water District, as provided for in Chapter 924 of the Statutes of 1933.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 556.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

21041.

The district shall not be bound by any contract except as hereinafter provided unless the same shall be made in writing approved by resolution of the board of directors and properly executed by its officers who have been so authorized to do by the district. The approval of the form of all contracts shall be endorsed thereon by an attorney for the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21042.

The district may prescribe methods for the construction of works and for the letting of contracts for any of the following purposes:

(a) The construction of works, structures, or equipment.

(b) The performance or furnishing of labor, materials, or supplies, necessary or convenient for carrying out any of the purposes of this act.

(c) The acquisition or disposal of any real or personal property.

When work is not to be done by the district itself by force account, and the amount involved is forty thousand dollars ($40,000), or more, any contract for the doing of the works shall be made by the district with the lowest and best bidder after the publication pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation published within the district, of a notice calling for bids and fixing a period during which bids will be received, which shall be not less than 10 days after the publication of the notice. The district may reject any and all of the bids presented and may readvertise in its discretion. After rejecting bids, or if no bids are received, the district may determine and declare that in its opinion, based on estimates submitted by the engineer for the district, any work may be performed better or more economically by the district with its own employees, or after hiring additional employees. After the adoption of a resolution to this effect by at least seven affirmative votes of the directors of the district, the district may proceed to have that work done in the manner stated and without further observance of the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 142, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

21043.

(a) Contracts may be let or work undertaken without advertising for bids in an emergency.

(b) In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board of directors shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 29, Sec. 1.   Effective June 28, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

21044.

Contracts, in writing or otherwise, for the acquisition or disposal of any real property, for the acquisition or leasing of personal property, the purchase of water to replenish the groundwater supplies of the district, the repair of district equipment or structures, and for legal, engineering, and other professional services may be let without calling for competitive bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21045.

(a) The district shall require a person to whom the district awards a contract as a result of advertising for bids to enter into a bond, with good and sufficient sureties, to be approved by the board, payable to the district for its use, for at least 25 percent of the amount of the estimated contract price, conditioned for the faithful performance of the contract.

(b) The general manager of the district may require a person to whom the district awards a contract without advertising for bids to enter into a bond in accordance with subdivision (a).

(c) The work shall be done under the direction and to the satisfaction of the district engineer, and be subject to approval by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 29, Sec. 2.   Effective June 28, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 72. Municipal Water Districts [21050. - 21051.]

21050.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by municipal water districts, as provided for in Chapter 78 of the Statutes of 1935.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21051.

All contracts for the construction or extension of any waterworks, water system or water distribution system, or for furnishing labor, materials or supplies therefor as herein provided, shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder. The legislative body of such city shall advertise for two or more days in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in such city, inviting sealed proposals for furnishing labor, materials and supplies for the proposed waterworks, water system or water distribution system before any contract shall be made therefor. The said legislative body shall have the right to require such bonds as it may deem best from the successful bidder to insure the faithful performance of the contract, and shall also have the right to reject any and all bids; provided, however, that nothing herein contained shall be construed as prohibiting the municipality itself from constructing or extending such waterworks, water system, or water distribution system and employing the labor necessary therefor, without a contractor; and provided further, that in municipalities operating under a charter heretofore or hereafter framed under the provisions of the Constitution of the State of California, all acts required to be performed subsequent to the sale of such bonds by this act, shall be done and performed by the proper body, board, officer, or commission of such municipality, as is required or authorized by such charter to perform such acts, and in case such charter also prescribes the manner of letting and entering into contracts for the furnishing of labor, materials, or supplies for the constructing or extending of such waterworks, water system, or water distribution system, the contracts therefor shall be let and entered into in conformity with such charter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 73. San Bernardino County Flood Control District [21060. - 21061.]

21060.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the San Bernardino County Flood Control District, as provided for in Chapter 73 of the Statutes of 1939.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21061.

(a) All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, except as provided in this article, estimated to cost in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder in the manner provided in this article.

(b) The board of supervisors of the district shall advertise by five or more insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation, or by two or more insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation, printed and published in the district, inviting sealed proposals for the construction of the improvement or work. The board shall require the successful bidder or bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds, to be approved
 by the board, conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of all claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9550) of Title 3 of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and to be subject to that chapter.

(c) The board may also reject any bid not suitable to the best interests of the district. If all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement therefor, or the work consists of channel protection, dam protection, temporary work, maintenance work, or of emergency work, the board of supervisors may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. Emergency work may also be done by negotiated contract without advertising for bids or requiring bonds. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with
 Section 22050).

(d) The board of supervisors, acting as the board of the district, may, by ordinance, resolution, or board order, authorize the flood control engineer or other county officer to order changes or additions in work being performed under a construction contract. When so authorized, any change or addition in the work shall be ordered in writing by the flood control engineer, or other designated officer, and the extra cost for any change or addition to the work so ordered shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) when the total amount of the original contract does not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), nor 10 percent of the amount of any original contract that exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), but does not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). For contracts whose original cost exceeds two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the extra cost for any change or addition to the work so ordered
 shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), plus 5 percent of the amount of the original contract costs in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). In no event shall any such change or alteration exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 56.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 74. Ventura County Watershed Protection District [21070. - 21072.]

21070.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Ventura County Watershed Protection District, as provided for in Chapter 44 of the Statutes of the 1944 Fourth Extraordinary Session.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 67, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

21071.

(a) All contracts for any improvement or unit of work except as provided in this article estimated to cost in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder in the manner provided in this article. The board of supervisors of the district shall advertise by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction of, the improvement or work before any contract shall be made for the improvement or work, and may let by contract separately any part of the work or improvement. The board shall require the successful bidder to file with the board good and sufficient
 bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material in connection with the contract. The bonds shall contain the terms and conditions set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9550) of Title 3 of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and be subject to the provisions of that chapter. The board shall also have the right to reject any and all bids. If all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received pursuant to the advertisement, the estimated cost of the work does not exceed the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work when necessary in order to protect life and property from impending flood damage, the board of supervisors may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account or negotiated contract.

(b) The district shall have the power to
 purchase in the open market without advertising for bids, materials, supplies, equipment, and other personal property for use in any work either under contract or by force account if the costs do not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000). It shall be the duty of the purchasing agent of Ventura County, as the ex officio purchasing agent of the Ventura County Watershed Protection District, unless otherwise ordered by the board of supervisors, to purchase for the district all materials, supplies, equipment, and other personal property necessary to carry out the purposes of this article, and to engage independent contractors to perform sundry services for the district, if the aggregate cost of such work, exclusive of materials to be furnished by the district, does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(c) The purchasing agent shall make all purchases and contracts upon proper requisition, signed by the engineer-manager of the district, or his
 or her authorized representative.

(d) If the work consists of the maintenance or alteration of existing facilities, including electrical, painting, and roofing if the cost of labor and materials for the work according to the engineer’s estimate will exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), and if the work is not of the type of work referred to in this section, the maintenance and alteration work shall be performed under a contract or contracts that shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in the manner described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 57.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

21072.

(a) Emergency work may be done by negotiated contract without advertising for bids or requiring bonds.

(b) In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board of supervisors shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 67, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 75. Humboldt County Flood Control District [21080. - 21081.]

21080.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Humboldt County Flood Control District, as provided for in Chapter 939 of the Statutes of 1945.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21081.

All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, when the cost, according to the estimate of the engineer, will exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in the manner provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit for the whole of the work, or shall be divided into severable parts, or both, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall call for bids and advertise the call by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work before
 any contract is made. The call for bids shall state whether the work is to be performed as a unit or divided into severable specific parts, or both, as stated in the call. The board may let the work by single contract for the whole or it may divide such work into severable parts by separate contracts, as stated in such call, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall require the successful bidder or bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid. In the event all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, or the estimated cost of such work does not exceed
 five thousand dollars ($5,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board of supervisors may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. The district may purchase in the open market, without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 58.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 76. Riverside County Flood Control and Water Conservation District [21090. - 21091.]

21090.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Riverside County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, as provided for in Chapter 1122 of the Statutes of 1945.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21091.

All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, except as otherwise provided in this act, estimated to cost in excess of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder in the manner provided in this article. The board of supervisors of the district shall advertise by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction of the improvement or work before any contract is made, and may let by contract separately any part of the work or improvement. The board shall require the successful bidder to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned
 upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material. The bonds shall contain the terms and conditions set forth in Sections 10223 and 10224, and Section 9554 of the Civil Code and be subject to those sections. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid. If all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, or where the estimated cost of the work does not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board of supervisors may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The district may purchase in the open market, without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any improvement or unit of work either under contract or by force
 account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 59.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 77. San Luis Obispo County Flood Control and Water Conservation District [21100. - 21102.]

21100.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the San Luis Obispo County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, as provided for in Chapter 1294 of the Statutes of 1945.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21101.

All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, when the cost, according to the estimate of the engineer, will exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in the manner provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit for the whole of the work, or shall be divided into parts, or both, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall call for bids and advertise the call by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work before any contract
 shall be made. The call for bids shall state whether the work is to be performed as a unit or is to be divided into severable specific parts, or both, as stated in the call. The board may let the work by single contract for the whole as a unit or it may divide the work into severable parts by separate contracts, as stated in the call, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall require the successful bidder or bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid. In the event all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, or the estimated cost of the work does not
 exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board of supervisors may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The district shall have the power to purchase in the open market without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 60.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

21102.

The board shall have full authority to cause to be inserted in specifications and contracts for any flood control or other work financed or paid for in whole or in part out of moneys obtained from the United States, or any department or agency thereof, as a loan, grant, or appropriation, such provisions or terms as may be prescribed by the United States, or such department or agency, as a condition upon which such federal funds are loaned, granted, or appropriated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 78. Santa Barbara County Water Agency [21110. - 21112.]

21110.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Santa Barbara County Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 1501 of the Statutes of 1945.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21111.

(a) All contracts for the construction of any unit of work, except as provided in this article, estimated to cost in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder in the manner provided in this article. The board of directors of the agency shall advertise by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation published in the agency’s jurisdiction inviting sealed proposals for the construction of the work before any contract shall be made, and may let by contract separately any part of the work. The board shall require the successful bidder to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the
 faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of the claims for labor and material. The faithful performance bond shall contain terms and conditions as the board may specify, and the payment bond shall be subject to the provisions of, and shall contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code, as applicable. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid, in which case the board may advertise for new bids. In the event no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, or where the estimated cost of the work does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or the work consists of emergency work, the board of directors by unanimous vote of all members present may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The agency may purchase in the
 open market, and may authorize the Purchasing Agent of the County of Santa Barbara to purchase, without advertisement for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account.

(b) If the work to be performed by or on behalf of the agency does not involve an expenditure of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, or if the work consists of emergency work, the agency may require a faithful performance bond. The agency may require a payment bond on work performed on behalf of the agency which does not involve an expenditure of more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 61.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

21112.

The provisions of this article shall have no application to a contract entered into with the United States under the authority of Section 6 of Chapter 1501 of the Statutes of 1945, or to a contract authorized by a vote of the electorate of the agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 79. Monterey County Flood Control and Water Conservation District [21120. - 21121.]

21120.
